Florida, session 2026, SB16.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 71 72 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 73 found and declared to be true. 74 Section 2.âThe City of St. Petersburg is directed to draw a 75 warrant in the sum of $2.3 million payable to Heriberto A. 76 Sanchez-Mayen as compensation for injuries and damages 77 sustained. 78 Section 3.âThe amount paid by the City of St. Petersburg 79 pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded 80 under this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for 81 all present and future claims arising out of the factual 82 situation described in this act which resulted in injuries and 83 damages to Heriberto A. Sanchez-Mayen. The total amount paid for 84 attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent 85 of the total amount awarded under this act. 86 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.